Washington statutes.
RCW 19.31.030

Records.

Each employment agency shall keep records of all services rendered employers and applicants. These records shall contain the name and address of the employer by whom the services were solicited; the name and address of the applicant; kind of position ordered by the employer; dates job orders or job listings are obtained; subsequent dates job orders or job listings are verified as still being current; kind of position accepted by the applicant; probable duration of the employment, if known; rate of wage or salary to be paid the applicant; amount of the employment agency's fee; dates and amounts of refund if any, and reason for such refund; and the contract agreed to between the agency and applicant. An employment listing service need not keep records pertaining to the kind of position accepted by applicant and probable duration of employment.

An employment directory shall keep records of all services rendered to applicants. These records shall contain: The name and address of the applicant; amount of the employment directory's fee; dates and amounts of refund if any, and reason for the refund; the contract agreed to between the employment directory and applicant; and the dates of contact with employers made pursuant to RCW 19.31.190(11).

The director shall have authority to demand and to examine, at the employment agency's regular place of business, all books, documents, and records in its possession for inspection. Unless otherwise provided by rules or regulation adopted by the director, such records shall be maintained for a period of three years from the date in which they are made.

[ 1993 c 499 s 2; 1969 ex.s. c 228 s 3.]